District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0549.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Safe Community Places and Policing Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. An Act To create a Department of Corrections in the District of Columbia,
effective approved June 27, 1946 (60 Stat. 320; D.C. Official Code § 24-211.01 et seq.), is
amended by adding a new section 7a to read as follows:
“Sec. 7a. Limitations on the transport of federal agency officers and coordinated police
activity.
(a) Absent a judicial warrant or order issued by a federal judge appointed pursuant to
Article III of the United States Constitution or a federal magistrate judge appointed pursuant to


28 U.S.C. § 631 that authorizes a federal agency to take into custody the person who is the
subject of such warrant or order, the District of Columbia shall not assist in:
“(1) Providing transportation to an agent of a federal agency for purposes of
immigration enforcement in a District-owned or operated vehicle, except mass public transit;
“(2) Conducting surveillance or patrol operations as part of any civil immigration
enforcement activity; or
“(3)(A) Conducting immigration law enforcement operations, absent exigent
circumstances, in coordination with federal agencies or executed in whole or part by federal
authorities or out-of-state authorities at safe community places.
“(B) For purposes of this paragraph, the term “safe community places”
means:
“(i) A hospital or other facility providing healthcare or behavioral
health services;
“(ii) A school, daycare, or pre-school;
“(iii) A library;
“(iv) A designated disaster and emergency response site;
“(v) A courthouse or family court self-help center;
“(vi) A housing service provider, housing facility, shelter or day
center, rape crisis center, domestic violence shelter, or human trafficking service provider;
“(vii) A Department of Human Services office;
“(viii) The DC WIC clinic;


“(ix) A family support collaborative or any neighborhood
collaborative in partnership with the Child and Family Services Agency through the Healthy
Families/Thriving Communities Collaborative;
“(x) A legal service provider;
“(xi) A District-operated park or recreation center;
“(xi) A community resource center; or
“(xii) Any other location designated by the Office of the Attorney
General;
“(b) The District shall conduct trainings of its employees on compliance with the
provisions in this section.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 60-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(2) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(2)).